Louisiana, session 2026, HB294.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5233.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5233.2. Protection of freedom of worship; limitation of liability
A. The Legislature of Louisiana finds that churches or other places of
worship are private property dedicated to the free exercise of religion, that religious
assemblies are protected by the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution
of Louisiana, and that the right to exclude disruptive and potentially violent
individuals may be necessary to facilitate the free exercise of religion. The
Legislature of Louisiana further finds that clarification of existing statutory authority
is in the furtherance of justice and the free exercise of religion.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 294 ENROLLED
B. Any religious leader, authorized security team member, or person who is
lawfully on the premises of a church or other place of worship may request that a
person leave the premises if the person is committing criminal trespass pursuant to
R.S. 14:63 or is engaged in a substantial disruption. A verbal request to leave the
premises shall constitute notice to the person that he is not authorized to be present.
C. Any person who is lawfully on the premises may use reasonable and
apparently necessary force when used in accordance with the following:
(1) To prevent a forcible offense against a person who is lawfully on the
premises.
(2) To physically remove a trespassing person who refuses to leave the
premises following a request made pursuant to Subsection B of this Section.
(3) When done in accordance with R.S. 14:19.
D.(1) When force or violence is used to prevent criminal trespass or the
disruption of worship services, or any other activity at the church or other place of
worship, the use of force by a person who is lawfully on the premises shall be limited
to an amount reasonably and apparently necessary to terminate the trespass or
substantial disruption, or force proportionate to that used by the person committing
the trespass or causing the disruption.
(2) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize the use of deadly
force except where otherwise allowed by law for purposes of self-defense.
E.(1) Any person who is lawfully on the premises who uses reasonable and
apparently necessary force pursuant to this Section and the organization which owns
or leases the premises for religious activities shall not be liable in tort to any person
for the use of such force.
(2) A request made pursuant to Subsection B of this Section shall constitute
an affirmative defense against any criminal or civil action brought against a person
who was lawfully on the premises and used reasonable and apparently necessary
force to terminate a trespass.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 294 ENROLLED
(3) The provisions of this Subsection do not apply if any of the following
occur:
(a) The use of force was grossly disproportionate to the force used by the
criminal trespasser.
(b) Deadly force was used unlawfully and unnecessarily.
(c) The person who used force was engaged in any unlawful conduct.
(4) In any civil action arising from the use of force against a trespasser
pursuant to this Section, a defendant who is either a person who was lawfully present
on the premises or a religious organization may file a motion asserting immunity
from suit. Upon the filing of the motion, the court shall conduct a pretrial immunity
hearing. If the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that the
defendant is entitled to immunity, the court shall dismiss the action.
F. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to do any of the following:
(1) Prohibit the lawful, peaceful protest outside the premises of a church or
other place of worship that does not obstruct access to the premises.
(2) Supercede any other provision of law related to self-defense.
(3) Limit the authority of law enforcement.
(4) Limit constitutional free speech or free exercise of religion.
G. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Church or other place of worship" means any building, structure, or
outdoor private property that is owned, leased, or otherwise lawfully possessed by
a religious organization that is used for organized religious worship or other religious
activities.
(2) "Religious leader" means a pastor, minister, priest, deacon, rabbi, imam,
trustee, elder, or any other person formally recognized by a church or other place of
worship as having authority to maintain order during a religious service.
(3) "Substantial disruption" means conduct that does any of the following:
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 294 ENROLLED
(a) Physically obstructs or attempts to obstruct a religious service or other
activity taking place at a church or other place of worship.
(b) Prevents or materially interferes with the ability of a person to participate
in religious worship or other activity taking place at a church or other place of
worship.
(c) Continues after a lawful directive to cease such conduct.
(4) "Substantial disruption" does not include peaceful activity conducted
outside the premises that does not obstruct access to or from the premises.
Section 2. R.S. 14:19(A)(1)(b)(i) and (2) and (B)(introductory paragraph) and (1)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§19. Use of force or violence in defense
* * *
A.(1) The use of force or violence upon the person of another is justifiable
under either of the following circumstances:
* * *
(b)(i) When committed by a person lawfully inside a dwelling, a place of
business, a church or other place of worship as defined in R.S. 13:5233.2, or a motor
vehicle as defined in R.S. 32:1(40) when the conflict began, against a person who is
attempting, or who has made, to make an unlawful entry into the dwelling, place of
business, or motor vehicle, or who has made an unlawful entry into the dwelling,
place of business, premises or motor vehicle as described in this Section, and the
person using the force or violence reasonably believes that the use of force or
violence is necessary to prevent the entry or to compel the intruder to leave the
dwelling, place of business, premises or motor vehicle.
* * *
(2) The provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Section shall Subsection does not
apply where the force or violence results in a homicide.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 294 ENROLLED
B. For the purposes of this Section, there shall be a presumption that a
person lawfully inside a dwelling, place of business, church or other place of
worship, or motor vehicle held a reasonable belief that the use of force or violence
was necessary to prevent unlawful entry thereto, or to compel an unlawful intruder
to leave the premises or motor vehicle, if both of the following occur:
(1) The person against whom the force or violence was used was in the
process of unlawfully and forcibly entering or had unlawfully and forcibly entered
the dwelling, place of business, church or other place of worship, or motor vehicle.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.